Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Enforcement; Penalties; Actions

§ 59-21-151.
Enforcement of chapter.

All peace officers and other law enforcement officials are hereby authorized, empowered and enjoined to enforce the provisions of this chapter within their respective jurisdictions.

It shall be the duty of each district attorney in this state and each county prosecuting attorney in each county of this state to prosecute and defend, for the state, in all courts of the county or counties in his district or county, all causes, criminal or civil, arising under the provisions of this chapter or under any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under this chapter, in which the state may be a party or may be interested or concerned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-26; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 26; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 11, eff from and after June 15, 1964.

§ 59-21-153.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be subject to the following penalties:

For a violation of any of the provisions of Sections 59-21-23(d), 59-21-29, 59-21-33, 59-21-55, 59-21-81 through 59-21-87, and 59-21-111 through 59-21-129, by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both.

For the violation of any provision of Section 59-21-31, by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both.

For the violation of any other provision of this chapter, by a fine of not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-26; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 26; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 11; Laws, 1988, ch. 327, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 59-21-155.
Disposition of fines and penalties.

All monies collected as fines or penalties for violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over by the court, justice court judge, or other officer collecting or receiving the fines or penalties to the county having jurisdiction over the violation as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-26; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 26; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 11; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 14; Laws, 1995, ch. 439, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 59-21-157.
Civil liability for violation of provisions of chapter.

The owner or operator of a vessel, or both, shall be civilly liable for any injury or damage proximately resulting from the negligent failure of such owner or operator to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-27; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1960).

§ 59-21-159.
Venue of actions based upon chapter.

The venue of any action based on this chapter may be in the county in which the vessel is usually moored, docked, housed or garaged, or in the county in which a vessel is involved in a boating accident, or in event of a boating accident taking place on a navigable waterway which is the boundary line of a county in either county so bounded, or in the county of the residence of the owner or operator of any such vessel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-27; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1960).

§ 59-21-161.
Service of process on nonresidents.

The acceptance by a nonresident of the right and privileges of operating a vessel or motorboat on any of the waters of this state, as evidenced by his operating, either in person or by agent or employee, a vessel or motorboat upon any of the navigable waters of this state, shall be deemed equivalent to an appointment by such nonresident of the secretary of state of the State of Mississippi to be his true and lawful attorney, upon whom may be served all lawful processes or summonses in any action or proceeding against him, growing out of a violation of the provisions of this chapter, or of any accident in which said nonresident may be involved while operating a vessel or motorboat on the navigable waters of the state. Such service of process may be had in the same manner as is provided by Section 13-3-63, for the service of process on nonresidents operating motor vehicles upon the highways of this state, and shall have the same effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-27; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1960).

§ 59-21-163.
Effect of Sections 59-21-157 through 59-21-161 on other causes of action.

The provisions of Sections 59-21-157 through 59-21-161 shall not be construed to limit any cause of action heretofore maintainable at common law, maritime law or in admiralty, but shall be cumulative and supplemental thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-27; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1960).